Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201944-2706
Board of directors; members; how selected; voting rights; represent insurers; expenses.

(1) The board of directors of the association shall consist of not less than seven nor more than eleven members serving terms as established in the plan of operation. The members of the board shall be selected by member insurers subject to the approval of the director. Vacancies on the board shall be filled for the remaining period of the term in the manner described in the plan of operation. To select the initial board of directors and initially organize the association, the director shall give notice to all member insurers of the time and place of the organizational meeting. In determining voting rights at the organizational meeting each member insurer shall be entitled to one vote in person or by proxy. If the board of directors is not selected within sixty days after notice of the organizational meeting, the director may appoint the initial members.

(2) In approving selections or in appointing members to the board, the director shall consider, among other things, whether all member insurers are fairly represented.

(3) Members of the board may be reimbursed from the assets of the association for expenses incurred by them as members of the board as provided in sections 81-1174 to 81-1177 for state employees but shall not otherwise be compensated by the association for their services.

Laws 1975, LB 217, § 6;

Laws 1981, LB 204, § 72;

Laws 2019, LB159, § 3.